Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.230

Services at senior centers and community-based sealant programs—Dental hygienist duties.

A dental hygienist participating in a program under RCW 18.29.056 that involves providing services at senior centers, as defined in RCW 18.29.056, or under RCW 18.29.220 that involves removing deposits and stains from the surfaces of teeth in a community-based sealant program must:

(1) Provide the patient or, if the patient is a minor, the parent or legal guardian of the patient, if reasonably available, with written information that includes at least the following:

(a) A notice that the treatment being given under the program is not a comprehensive oral health care service, but is provided as a preventive service only; and

(b) A recommendation that the patient should be examined by a licensed dentist for comprehensive oral health care services; and

(2) Assist the patient in obtaining a referral for further dental planning and treatment, including providing a written description of methods and sources by which a patient may obtain a referral, if needed, to a dentist, and a list of licensed dentists in the community. Written information should be provided to the parent on the potential needs of the patient.

[ 2007 c 270 s 3.]

NOTES:

Report—2007 c 270: See note following RCW 18.29.056.